Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1779.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 12 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 102. (Reserved). § 103. Algorithmic pricing transparency and fairness. (a) Disclosure.--A person or entity that knowingly advertises, promotes, labels or publishes a statement, display, image, offer or announcement of personalized algorithmic pricing using consumer data specific to a particular individual shall include with the statement, display, image, offer or announcement a clear and conspicuous disclosure that states:"THIS PRICE WAS SET BY AN ALGORITHM USING YOUR PERSONAL DATA."12345678910111213141516171819 (b) Protected class data.--No person, firm, partnership, association or corporation, or agent or employee thereof, shall use protected class data in setting a price for, offering, marketing or selling any good or service if:(1) the use of that data has the effect of withholding or denying any of the accommodations, advantages and privileges accorded to others; or(2) the price for the good or service is different from the price offered to other individuals or groups based in whole or in part on the use of protected class data.(c) Violation.--If there is a violation of subsection (a) or (b), the following shall apply:(1) The Office of Attorney General is authorized to investigate violations of this section in accordance with the following:(i) The Attorney General may initiate, in Commonwealth Court or the court of common pleas of the county in which the person or entity resides or has a place of business, an action in equity for an injunction to restrain each violation of this section.(ii) An injunction may be issued by a court under subparagraph (i) without requiring proof that any person has been injured or experienced damages.(iii) If an injunction is issued, the respondent shall be given five days' notice to comply.(iv) In seeking an action, the Attorney General is authorized to take proof and make a determination of the relevant facts and to issue subpoenas.(2) A court may impose a civil penalty of up to $1,000 for each violation of subsection (a) or (b).20250HB1779PN2188 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Remedies.--In addition to any other remedies provided in this section, a person harmed by a violation of subsection (b) may file a complaint with the Bureau of Consumer Protection, which shall investigate each complaint.(e) Limitations.--Nothing in this section shall apply to:(1) An insurer licensed, regulated or otherwise authorized to do business in this Commonwealth under any insurance law or excess lines insurer, including a person, agent or affiliate acting on behalf of an insurer.(2) Financial services, including financial institutions, financial institution affiliates, broker-dealers, registered investment advisors and entities that provide credit cards, personal loans, mortgages and other consumer credit products.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Algorithm." A computational process that uses a set of rules to define a sequence of operations."Clear and conspicuous disclosure." A disclosure in the same medium as and provided on, at or near and contemporaneous with each advertisement, display, image, offer or announcement of a price for which notice is required, using lettering and wording that is easily visible and understandable to the average consumer."Consumer." A natural person who is seeking or solicited to purchase, lease or receive a good or service for personal, family or household use."Consumer data." Any data that identifies or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a specific 20250HB1779PN2188 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 natural person or device, excluding location data."Dynamic pricing." Pricing that fluctuates dependent on conditions where models retrain or recalibrate on information in near real time, excluding promotional pricing offers, loyalty program benefits or other temporary discounts or changes to pricing related to retention of existing customers."Personalized algorithmic pricing." Dynamic pricing derived from or set by an algorithm that uses consumer data which may vary among individual consumers or consumer populations."Protected class data." Information about an individual person or groups of people that directly, in combination or by implication identifies a characteristic that is legally protected from discrimination under the laws of this Commonwealth or under Federal law, including ethnicity, national origin, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, pregnancy outcomes and reproductive health care.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1779PN2188 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718